Florida, session 2026, HB1209.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
19
20 Section 1. Section 624.491, Florida Statutes, is amended
21 to read:
22 624.491 Pharmacy audits; enforcement; penalties;
23 rulemaking.—
24 (1) A pharmacy benefits plan or program as defined in s.
25 626.8825 providing pharmacy benefits must comply with the
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1209-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1209 2026
26 requirements of this section when the pharmacy benefits plan or
27 program or any person or entity acting on behalf of the pharmacy
28 benefits plan or program, including, but not limited to, a
29 pharmacy benefit manager as defined in s. 626.88, audits the
30 records of a pharmacy licensed under chapter 465. The person or
31 entity conducting such audit must:
32 (a) Apply uniform audit standards, scope, frequency, and
33 penalty practices to all pharmacies within the pharmacy benefits
34 plan or program's network, including pharmacy benefit manager-
35 owned or affiliated pharmacies and nonaffiliated pharmacies.
36 (b) Not impose stricter audit methodologies, higher error
37 thresholds, expanded documentation requirements, or more
38 frequent audits on nonaffiliated pharmacies than on pharmacy
39 benefit manager-owned or affiliated pharmacies.
40 (c) Upon request by the office or a network pharmacy
41 subject to audit, provide documentation demonstrating compliance
42 with paragraph (a) or paragraph (b), including a comparison of
43 audit frequency, scope, methodologies and recoupment rates
44 between pharmacy benefit manager-owned or affiliated pharmacies
45 and nonaffiliated pharmacies.
46 (d)(a) Except as provided in subsection (5) (3), notify
47 the pharmacy in writing at least 30 7 calendar days before any
48 the initial onsite or remote audit for each audit cycle.
49 (e)(b) Not schedule an onsite audit during the first 7 3
50 calendar days of a month unless the pharmacist consents in
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1209-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1209 2026
51 writing otherwise.
52 (f) Not disrupt patient care or otherwise interfere with
53 the pharmacy's daily operations.
54 (g)(c) Limit the duration of the audit period to 24 months
55 after the date a claim is submitted to or adjudicated by the
56 entity.
57 (h) Limit each audit to a random sampling of no more than
58 0.1 percent of prescriptions. Additional claims may be audited
59 only if fraud, waste, or abuse is reasonably suspected and
60 stated in writing.
61 (i) Use a random selection process for conducting audits.
62 Targeted selection based on drug class, cost, or therapeutic
63 category is prohibited unless fraud, waste, or abuse is
64 reasonably suspected and stated in writing.
65 (j)(d) In the case of an audit that requires clinical or
66 professional judgment, conduct the audit in consultation with,
67 or allow the audit to be conducted by, a pharmacist licensed in
68 this state.
69 (k)(e) Allow the pharmacy to use the written and
70 verifiable records of a prescriber, hospital, physician, or
71 other authorized practitioner, which are transmitted by any
72 means of communication, to validate the pharmacy records in
73 accordance with state and federal law. Electronic records and
74 scanned prescriptions are valid.
75 (l)(f) Reimburse the pharmacy for a claim that was
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1209-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1209 2026
76 retroactively denied for a clerical error, typographical error,
77 scrivener's error, or computer error, or an omission or
78 discrepancy in documentation that does not affect the identity
79 of the patient, the identity of the prescriber, the drug
80 dispensed, the quantity dispensed, the date of service, or the
81 accuracy of the amount paid under the claim, if the prescription
82 was properly and correctly dispensed, unless a pattern of such
83 errors exists, fraudulent billing is alleged, or the error
84 results in actual financial loss to the entity. Such errors are
85 not considered fraud unless there is clear and convincing
86 evidence of intent to defraud.
87 (m)(g) Provide the pharmacy with a copy of the preliminary
88 audit report within 30 120 days after the conclusion of the
89 audit.
90 (n)(h) Allow the pharmacy to produce documentation to
91 address a discrepancy or audit finding, or to initiate an
92 appeal, within 30 10 business days after the preliminary audit
93 report is delivered to the pharmacy. A written audit appeals
94 process is required.
95 (o)(i) Provide the pharmacy and the plan sponsor with a
96 copy of the final audit report within 90 days 6 months after the
97 pharmacy's receipt of the preliminary audit report.
98 (p)(j) Calculate any recoupment or penalties based on
99 actual overpayments. Recoupment may and not be calculated
100 according to the accounting practice of extrapolation unless
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1209-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1209 2026
101 agreed upon in writing as part of a settlement. Recoupment is
102 limited to the dispensing fee unless the pharmacy failed to
103 dispense the drug or acted with willful intent to defraud.
104 Ingredient cost recoupment is prohibited unless fraud or willful
105 misrepresentation is proven. All recouped funds must be returned
106 in full to the plan sponsor. Recoupment may not occur until:
107 l. The pharmacy has had at least 30 days to respond.
108 2. All appeals are resolved.
109 3. A final audit report is issued.
110 (q) Not be compensated based on recovery amounts.
111 (2) The person or entity conducting such audit may not:
112 (a) Disregard valid inventory acquired in accordance with
113 state and federal law and legitimate business practices. All
114 legally sourced products held by the pharmacy at the time of
115 dispensing must count toward inventory reconciliation.
116 (b) Impose additional notification or approval
117 requirements for routine pharmacy business decisions.
118 (c) Require sourcing from a narrower list of distributors
119 than what is permitted under state or federal licensure
120 standards.
121 (d) Impose manufacturer-driven restrictions on the source
122 of drug products used in audit reconciliation.
123 (e) Reject purchases from pharmacy-to-pharmacy transfers
124 conducted in accordance with state and federal law and
125 accompanied by appropriate transaction documentation.
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1209-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1209 2026
126 (f) Require bank statements, deposit records, including
127 copies of the front or back of checks, and point-of-sale
128 transaction records, or a combination of such records if any one
129 or more of these records sufficiently demonstrates copay
130 collection consistent with industry norms. Reasonable proof of
131 copay collection shall be limited to standard pharmacy records,
132 including signature logs, point-of-sale transaction records, and
133 accounting records.
134 (g) Require subsequent attestations from the patient. Lack
135 of subsequent attestation may not be used to justify claim
136 reversal or recoupment if a pharmacy possesses valid
137 documentation that medication was dispensed to the patient or
138 his or her authorized representative, including, but not limited
139 to, signature logs, electronic dispensing records, point-of-sale
140 transaction records, or an in-person pharmacist acknowledgement
141 of dispensing.
142 (h) Initiate subsequent attestations more than 180 days
143 after the date of service.
144 (i) Require duplicate or extraordinary documentation
145 beyond what is required under state and federal law in invoice
146 audits. The following is deemed sufficient proof of lawful
147 acquisition of products for audit reconciliation purposes:
148 1. Invoices from licensed wholesalers or distributors.
149 2. Valid documentation of pharmacy-to-pharmacy transfers
150 conducted in accordance with state or federal law.
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1209-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1209 2026
151 3. Records consistent with Drug Supply Chain Security Act,
152 21 U.S.C. ss. 351 et seq., and Board of Pharmacy requirements.
153
154 Documentation may not be required unless reasonably necessary to
155 validate lawful inventory acquisitions.
156 (3)(a) An audit designated as a fraud, waste, or abuse
157 audit must be based on specific, documented evidence or a
158 credible allegation of fraud, waste, or abuse involving the
159 pharmacy or a specific claim or set of claims under review.
160 (b) The person or entity conducting a fraud, waste, or
161 abuse audit must provide the pharmacy with, in writing, before
162 commencement of such audit:
163 1. A clear statement that the audit is designated as a
164 fraud, waste, or abuse audit.
165 2. A list of the specific facts, data, or allegations
166 forming the basis for the fraud, waste, or abuse designation.
167 3. Identification of the specific claims or classes of
168 claims to which the fraud, waste, or abuse designation applies.
169 (c) A person or entity auditing the records of a pharmacy
170 licensed under chapter 465 may not use a fraud, waste, or abuse
171 audit designation to circumvent any provision of this section
172 unless the audit complies fully with this subsection.
173 (4)(2) This section does not apply to:
174 (a) Audits conducted by the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit or
175 initiated under a criminal investigation supported by probable
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1209-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1209 2026
176 cause;
177 (b)(a) Audits in which suspected fraudulent activity or
178 other intentional or willful misrepresentation is evidenced by a
179 physical review, review of claims data or statements, or other
180 investigative methods;
181 (c)(b) Audits of claims paid for by federally funded
182 programs; or
183 (d)(c) Concurrent reviews or desk audits that occur within
184 3 business days after transmission of a claim and where no
185 chargeback or recoupment is demanded.
186 (5)(3) An entity that audits a pharmacy located within a
187 Health Care Fraud Prevention and Enforcement Action Team (HEAT)
188 Task Force area designated by the United States Department of
189 Health and Human Services and the United States Department of
190 Justice may dispense with the notice requirements of paragraph
191 (1)(d) (1)(a) if such pharmacy has been a member of a
192 credentialed provider network for less than 12 months.
193 (6)(4) Pursuant to s. 408.7057, and after receipt of the
194 final audit report issued under paragraph (1)(o) (1)(i), a
195 pharmacy may appeal the findings of the final audit report as to
196 whether a claim payment is due and as to the amount of a claim
197 payment.
198 (7)(5) A pharmacy benefits plan or program that, under
199 terms of a contract, transfers to a pharmacy benefit manager the
200 obligation to pay a pharmacy licensed under chapter 465 for any
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1209-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1209 2026
201 pharmacy benefit claims arising from services provided to or for
202 the benefit of an insured or subscriber remains responsible for
203 a violation of this section.
204 (8) The office shall enforce this section and may:
205 (a) Investigate complaints of violations of this section.
206 (b) Issue cease and desist orders.
207 (c) Impose administrative fines as follows:
208 1. For misuse of the fraud, waste, or abuse designation in
209 violation of subsection (3), a fine not to exceed $100,000 per
210 violation.
211 2. For a violation of paragraph (1)(a), paragraph (1)(b),
212 or paragraph (1)(c), a fine not to exceed $50,000 per violation.
213 3. For any other violation of this section, a fine not to
214 exceed $25,000 per violation.
215 (d) Order restitution for improper recoupments.
216 (e) Prohibit any person or entity from conducting audits
217 under this section for up to 2 years upon a finding that such
218 person or entity has committed willful abuse of the fraud,
219 waste, or abuse designation in violation of subsection (3).
220 (f) Suspend or revoke a pharmacy benefit manager's
221 registration under s. 624.490 for repeated or willful
222 violations.
223 (9) The commission shall adopt rules necessary to
224 implement this section.
225 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1209-00